Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB320.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Prohibiting For-Profit Hospitals Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"For-profit entity." The term includes a corporation, limited liability corporation, limited liability partnership, private equity, investment bank or hedge fund which operates to generate revenue or profit for its owners, partners or shareholders."Health system." An entity owning and operating one or more 1234567891011121314151617 hospitals, hospice agencies or nursing homes."Hospital." An institution licensed in this Commonwealth which is a general, mental, chronic disease or other type of hospital.Section 3. Prohibition.A for-profit entity may not own or manage a hospital or health system in this Commonwealth.Section 4. Applicability.The prohibition under section 3 shall not apply to a hospital or health system owned or managed by a for-profit entity on the effective date of this section.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0320PN0303 - 2 - 12345678910111213